Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 4. Judgments and Personal Representative.

Sec. 13.21.075.
Effect of adjudication for or against personal representative.

An adjudication rendered in any jurisdiction in favor of or against any personal representative of the estate is as binding on the local personal representative as if the representative were a party to the adjudication.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)